Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
ARTICLE 30
UNIFORM UNINCORPORATED NONPROFIT
ASSOCIATION ACT

Editor's note:

The governor signed S-94-168 which enacted this article on May 22, 1994. Section 7-30-117 sets forth July 1, 1994, as the date the article shall take effect.

Law reviews:

For article, "

C

olorado

C

hoice of Form of Organization and Structure 2001", see 30 Colo. Law. 11 (Oct. 2001); for article "Entity and Trade Name Registration: 2001 Update", see 30 Colo. Law. 81 (Oct. 2001); for article, "No Paper Required: Business Entity Legislation Makes Life Easier for Business Lawyers", see 33 Colo. Law. 6 (June 2004); for article, "Entity and Trade Name Registration: 2004 Update", see 34 Colo. Law. 11 (Jan. 2005).

Section

UNIFORM UNINCORPORATED NONPROFIT ASSOCIATION ACT
PREFATORY NOTE

This Act reforms the common law concerning unincorporated, nonprofit associations in three basic areas -- authority to acquire, hold, and transfer property, especially real property; authority to sue and be sued as an entity; and contract and tort liability of officers and members of the association.

At common law an unincorporated association, whether nonprofit or for-profit, was not a separate legal entity. It was an aggregate of individuals. In many ways it had the characteristics of a business partnership.

This approach obviously created problems. A gift of real property to an unincorporated association failed because no legal entity existed to receive it. For example, a gift of Blackacre to Somerset Social Club (an unincorporated, nonprofit association) would fail because in law there is no legal entity to receive title. Some courts in time became uncomfortable with this result. Some construed such a gift as a grant to the officers of the association to hold the real estate in trust and manage it for the benefit of the members of the association. Later, some legislatures provided various solutions, including treating the association for these purposes as an entity.

Proceedings by or against an unincorporated association presented similar problems. If it were not a legal entity, each of the members needed to be joined as party plaintiffs or defendants. Class action offered another approach. Again courts and legislatures, especially the latter, provided solutions. "Sue and be sued" statutes found their way on the law books of most states.

Unincorporated associations, not being legal entities, could not be liable in tort, contract, or otherwise for conduct taken in their names. On the other hand, their members could be. Courts borrowed from the law of partnership the concept that the members of the association, like partners, were co-principals. As co-principals they were individually liable. Again courts and legislatures, responding to concerns of their constituents about this result, modified these rules. Courts found that, in large membership associations, some members did not have the kind of control or participation in the decision process that made it reasonable and fair to view them as co-principals. Legislatures also took steps. Perhaps most striking are the statutes adopted in many states in the last decade excusing officers, directors, members, and volunteers of nonprofit organizations from liability for simple negligence. There is great variety in the details; a few statutes condition the immunity on the association carrying appropriate insurance or qualifying under Internal Revenue Code Section 501(c).

Related to liability is the question of enforcement of a judgment obtained against an unincorporated association, its members, and its property. If fewer than all members are liable in contract or tort, the property that members own jointly or in common may not be seized in execution of a judgment without severing the interest of those who are liable from those who are not. Again, courts using "joint debtor," "common property," and "common name" statutes fashioned more workable solutions. Some legislatures have also addressed the problem directly. For these purposes, unincorporated associations have been treated as legal entities -- like a corporation.

What is striking about the legislative treatment of these and other legal issues concerning unincorporated, nonprofit associations is that no state appears to have addressed them in a comprehensive, integrated, and internally consistent manner.

This Act deals with a limited number of the major issues relating to unincorporated, nonprofit associations in an integrated and consistent manner.

The American Bar Association first issued its Model Nonprofit Corporation Act in 1964; it was most recently revised in 1987. The act deals comprehensively with nonprofit corporations, including troublesome questions of governance and membership. This Act, on the other hand, does not treat these and other questions. Enactment of this Act would leave these matters to a jurisdiction's common law or its statutes on the subject. It should be noted, too, that many states have statutes on special kinds of unincorporated, nonprofit associations, such as churches, mutual benefit societies, social clubs, and veteran's organizations. Which of these acts should be repealed and which retained in whole or part may require careful consideration.

This Act applies to all unincorporated, nonprofit associations. Nonprofit organizations are often classified as public benefit, mutual benefit, or religious. For purposes of this Act, it is unnecessary to treat differently these three categories of unincorporated, nonprofit associations. Unlike some state laws, it is not confined to the nonprofit organizations recognized as nonprofit under Section 501(c) (3), (4), and (6) of the Internal Revenue Code. There is no principled basis for excluding any nonprofit association. Therefore, the Act covers unincorporated philanthropic, educational, scientific, and literary clubs, unions, trade associations, political organizations, cooperatives, churches, hospitals, condominium associations, neighborhood associations, and all other unincorporated, nonprofit associations. Their members may be individuals, corporations, other legal entities, or a mix.

The Act is designed to cover all of these associations to the extent possible. To the extent a jurisdiction decides to retain statutes dealing with specific kinds of nonprofit associations, this Act will supplement existing legislation. As is pointed out in the Comments, a state electing to adopt this Act will need to examine carefully its statutes to determine which its wants to repeal, which to amend, and which to retain.

The basic approach of the Act is that an unincorporated, nonprofit association is a legal entity for the purposes that the Act addresses. It does not make these associations legal entities for all purposes. It is left to the courts of an adopting state to determine whether to use this Act by analogy to conclude that an association is a legal entity for some other purpose.

It should be noted, too, that many of the provisions are intended to be supplemented by a jurisdiction's existing law. For example, Section 5 (numbered as section 7-30-105 in C.R.S.) which provides for the filing of a statement of association authority, does not provide details concerning the filing process. It leaves to other law such details as whether the filing officer returns a copy marked "filed" and stamps the hour and date thereof, and the amount of the filing fee.

Two sections are bracketed as optional -- Section 12 (numbered as section 7-30-112 in C.R.S.) on venue and Section 13 (numbered as section 7-30-113 in C.R.S.) on service of process. A jurisdiction may decide that its present rules are consistent with the entity view of an association and provide the appropriate rule. Therefore, it would not adopt Sections 12 and 13 (numbered as sections 7-30-112 and 7-30-113 in C.R.S.). Both sections deal with only a part of the questions of venue and service of process. This means that if they are adopted they are only a part of the jurisdiction's law on the subject. And perhaps they should be placed in the court rules or statutes on those subjects instead of in the state's code with the other sections of this Act.

A nonprofit organization wanting a comprehensive governance structure might consider incorporating under a nonprofit corporation statute, particularly one that follows the format of the ABA Model Nonprofit Corporation Act. These statutes provide, among other things, comprehensive governance provisions. As this Act contains none, adoption of a substantial charter and bylaws would be required to obtain similar internal rules and structure.

There has been concern that this Act may deter nonprofit organizations from incorporating and that failure to incorporate would deprive the public of protections incorporation would provide. Clearly, incorporation does provide governmental involvement that this Act does not.

Most jurisdictions regulate solicitation by charitable organizations. Many of these are comprehensive. See, for example, Ill. Ann. Stat. ch. 23, Sections 100-5121 (Smith-Hurd 1992); Minn. Stat. Ann. Sections 309.50-309.61 (West 1992); Uniform Management of Institutional Funds Act.

These statutes frequently require, among other things, filing of a comprehensive statement with the attorney general before soliciting funds, including a copy of contracts with any professional fundraisers, and registration of professional fundraisers. A range of civil and criminal sanctions are provided. These statutes apply to all persons soliciting for charitable purposes, incorporated or not. In short, this Act's nonprofit associations are covered.

It should be noted, too, that a nonprofit corporation or unincorporated, nonprofit association is not the only choice. The Uniform Law Foundation, like many Illinois foundations, is organized as a charitable trust. Ill. Ann. Stat. ch. 14, Sections 51-69, (Smith-Hurd 1992); Uniform Supervision of Trustees for Charitable Purposes Act. Finally, it should be repeated that this Act is needed for the informal nonprofit organizations that do not have legal advice and so may not consider whether to incorporate.

7-30-101. Definitions.

In this article:

"Member" means a person who, under the rules or practices of a nonprofit association, may participate in the selection of persons authorized to manage the affairs of the nonprofit association or in the development of policy of the nonprofit association or who is considered to be a member by such person and the nonprofit association.

"Nonprofit association" means an unincorporated organization consisting of two or more members joined by mutual consent for a common, lawful, nonprofit purpose. However, joint tenancy or tenancy in common does not by itself establish a nonprofit association, even if the co-owners share use of the property for a nonprofit purpose. "Nonprofit association" includes an acequia ditch association, whether or not the acequia ditch association is formed as an acequia ditch association as contemplated by section 7-42-101.5 (3) or is a ditch association operating as an acequia ditch association as contemplated by section 7-42-101.5 (3).

and (4) Repealed.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire article added, p. 1271, § 1, effective May 22.

L. 2003:

(3)(b) and (4)(b) added by revision, pp. 2356, 2357, §§ 347, 348.

L. 2013:

(2) amended, (HB 13-1168), ch. 87, p. 280, § 2, effective August 7.

Editor's note:

Subsections (3)(b) and (4)(b) provided for the repeal of subsections (3) and (4) respectively, effective July 1, 2004. (See L. 2003, pp. 2356, 2357.)

Cross references:

For additional definitions applicable to this article, see § 7-90-102.

7-30-101.1. Suspended, defunct, and dissolved nonprofit corporations.

Any nonprofit corporation other than a nonprofit corporation that is governed by the "Colorado Revised Nonprofit Corporation Act", articles 121 to 137 of this title, that was suspended, declared defunct, administratively dissolved, or dissolved by operation of law, and the business or affairs of which are continued for nonprofit purposes, with or without knowledge of the suspension, declaration, or dissolution, and the business and affairs of which are not wound up, shall be deemed an unincorporated organization that qualifies as a nonprofit association for purposes of sections 7-30-101.2 and 7-30-106, unless such nonprofit corporation is reinstated as provided in part 10 of article 90 of this title.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 645, § 2, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 848, § 1, effective July 1.

7-30-101.2. Charitable nonprofit corporations - private foundations.

As used in this section, "charitable purposes" means one or more charitable purposes enumerated in section 501(c)(3) of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, hereinafter referred to as "the internal revenue code" and formed exclusively for one or more charitable purposes.

In the case of a deemed unincorporated organization, its articles of incorporation shall be presumed to be its principal governing document for the purposes of this section.

Except as otherwise provided in its constitution, articles of association, or other principal governing document, the purposes of a charitable nonprofit association and the disposition of its assets upon liquidation shall be limited to charitable purposes.

Except as otherwise expressly provided in its constitution, articles of association, or a principal governing document, or otherwise determined by a court of competent jurisdiction, a charitable nonprofit association that is also a private foundation within the meaning of section 509 (a) of the internal revenue code:

Shall distribute such amounts for each taxable year at such time and in such manner as not to subject the nonprofit corporation to tax under section 4942 of the internal revenue code;

Shall not engage in any act of self-dealing as defined in section 4941(d) of the internal revenue code;

Shall not retain any excess business holdings as defined in section 4943(c) of the internal revenue code;

Shall not make any investments that would subject the nonprofit association to taxation under section 4944 of the internal revenue code;

Shall not make any taxable expenditures as defined in section 4945(d) of the internal revenue code.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 645, § 2, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 98:

(4)(d) amended, p. 611, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 2202, § 1, effective July 1, 2004.

7-30-102. Supplementary general principles of law and equity.

Principles of law and equity supplement this article unless displaced by a particular provision of it.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire article added, p. 1272, § 1, effective May 22.

7-30-103. Territorial application.

Real and personal property in this state may be acquired, held, encumbered, and transferred by a nonprofit association, whether or not the nonprofit association or a member has any other relationship to this state.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire article added, p. 1272, § 1, effective May 22.

7-30-104. Real and personal property - nonprofit association as legatee, devisee, or beneficiary.

A nonprofit association in its name may acquire, hold, encumber, or transfer an estate or interest in real or personal property.

A nonprofit association may be a legatee, devisee, or beneficiary of a trust or contract.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire article added, p. 1272, § 1, effective May 22.

7-30-105. Statement of authority as to real property.

A nonprofit association is an entity for purposes of, and may execute and record a statement of authority pursuant to, section 38-30-172, C.R.S.

In addition to the matters required or permitted to be contained therein pursuant to section 38-30-172, C.R.S., a statement of authority executed and recorded on behalf of a nonprofit association shall state any limitation that may exist upon the authority of the person named in the statement of authority, or holding the position described in the statement of authority, to execute instruments encumbering, conveying, or otherwise affecting title to the real property on behalf of the nonprofit association.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire article added, p. 1272, § 1, effective May 22.

L. 2003:

Entire section R&RE, p. 2202, § 2, effective July 1, 2004.

Editor's note:

Colorado amended subsection (1) (numbered as subsection (a) in the uniform act) to require the execution and recording of the statement of authority, and, in subsection (2) (numbered as subsection (b) in the uniform act), required that the statement be recorded in the county in which the property is situated. Further, Colorado amended § 7-30-105 to specify that property may be encumbered in addition to being transferred, whereas the uniform act refers only to transferring. The official comment should be read with these changes in mind.

7-30-106. Liability in contract and tort.

A nonprofit association is a legal entity separate from its members for the purposes of determining and enforcing rights, duties, and liabilities in contract and tort.

A person is not liable for a breach of a nonprofit association's contract merely because the person is a member of the nonprofit association, is authorized to participate in the management of the affairs of the nonprofit association, or is a person considered to be a member by the nonprofit association.

A person is not liable for a tortious act or omission for which a nonprofit association is liable merely because the person is a member of the nonprofit association, is authorized to participate in the management of the affairs of the nonprofit association, or is a person considered to be a member by the nonprofit association.

A tortious act or omission of a member or other person for which a nonprofit association is liable is not imputed to a person merely because the person is a member of the nonprofit association, is authorized to participate in the management of the affairs of the nonprofit association, or is a person considered to be a member by the nonprofit association.

A member of, or a person considered to be a member by, a nonprofit association may assert a claim against the nonprofit association. A nonprofit association may assert a claim against a member or a person considered to be a member by the nonprofit association.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire article added, p. 1273, § 1, effective May 22.

7-30-107. Capacity to assert and defend - standing.

A nonprofit association, in its name, may institute, defend, intervene, or participate in a judicial, administrative, or other governmental proceeding or in an arbitration, mediation, or any other form of alternative dispute resolution.

A nonprofit association may assert a claim in its name on behalf of its members if one or more members of the nonprofit association have standing to assert a claim in their own right, the interests the nonprofit association seeks to protect are germane to its purposes, and neither the claim asserted nor the relief requested requires the participation of a member.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire article added, p. 1274, § 1, effective May 22.

7-30-108. Effect of judgment or order.

A judgment or order against a nonprofit association is not by itself a judgment or order against a member or a person considered to be a member by the nonprofit association.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire article added, p. 1274, § 1, effective May 22.

7-30-109. Disposition of personal property of inactive nonprofit association.

If a nonprofit association has been inactive for three years or longer, a person in possession or control of personal property of the nonprofit association may transfer the property:

If a document of the nonprofit association states a person to whom transfer is to be made under those circumstances, to that person; or

If no person is so stated, to a nonprofit association or nonprofit corporation pursuing broadly similar purposes or to a government, governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire article added, p. 1274, § 1, effective May 22.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2203, § 3, effective July 1, 2004.

7-30-110. Appointment of agent to receive service of process.

A nonprofit association may deliver to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, a statement appointing an agent authorized to receive service of process. If a nonprofit association has such an agent, part 7 of article 90 of this title shall apply as if the agent were a registered agent required to be appointed pursuant to said part.

A statement appointing an agent authorized to receive service of process shall state:

The true name of the nonprofit association;

The principal office address of the principal office of the nonprofit association;

The registered agent name and registered agent address of the agent; and

A statement that the agent has consented to being so appointed.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 2203, § 4, effective July 1, 2004.)

to (6) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2002, p. 1810, § 3, effective July 1, 2002; p. 1674, § 1, effective October 1, 2002.)

Source:

L. 94:

Entire article added, p. 1274, § 1, effective May 22.

L. 2002:

(1) and (3) to (6) amended, p. 1810, § 3, effective July 1; (1) and (3) to (6) amended, p. 1674, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(1), (2), and (3) amended, p. 2203, § 4, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1) and (2)(b) amended, p. 1399, § 1, effective July 1.

7-30-111. Claim not abated by change of members or officers.

A claim for relief against a nonprofit association does not abate merely because of a change in its members, persons authorized to manage the affairs of the nonprofit association, or persons considered by the nonprofit association to be members.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire article added, p. 1275, § 1, effective May 22.

7-30-112. Venue.

For purposes of venue, a nonprofit association is a resident of a county or city and county in which it has an office.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire article added, p. 1275, § 1, effective May 22.

7-30-113. Summons and complaint - service on whom.

In an action or proceeding against a nonprofit association, a summons and complaint must be served on an agent authorized by appointment to receive service of process, an officer, a managing or general agent, or a person authorized to participate in the management of its affairs. If none of them can be served, service may be made on a member who may participate in the selection of persons authorized to manage the affairs of the nonprofit association or in the development of policy of the nonprofit association.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire article added, p. 1275, § 1, effective May 22.

Editor's note:

Colorado amended § 7-30-113 (numbered as Section 13 in the uniform act) by adding a qualification in the last sentence that service may be made on a member "who may participate in the selection of persons authorized to manage the affairs of the nonprofit association or in the development of policy of the nonprofit association".

7-30-114. Uniformity of application and construction.

This article shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this article among states enacting it.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire article added, p. 1275, § 1, effective May 22.

7-30-115. Short title.

This article may be cited as the "Uniform Unincorporated Nonprofit Association Act".

Source:

L. 94:

Entire article added, p. 1275, § 1, effective May 22.

7-30-116. Severability clause.

If any provision of this article or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect any other provisions or applications of this article which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this article are severable.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire article added, p. 1275, § 1, effective May 22.

7-30-117. Effective date.

This article shall take effect July 1, 1994.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire article added, p. 1276, § 1, effective May 22.

7-30-118. Transition concerning real and personal property.

If, before July 1, 1994, an estate or interest in real or personal property was purportedly transferred to a nonprofit association, on July 1, 1994, the estate or interest vests in the nonprofit association, unless the parties had treated the transfer as ineffective. No such purported transfer of real property shall impart notice pursuant to section 38-35-109, C.R.S., until the date after July 1, 1994, a deed or other proper instrument conveying such estate or interest in real property is recorded in the office of the clerk and recorder of the county or city and county in which such real property is located.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire article added, p. 1276, § 1, effective May 22.

Editor's note:

Colorado amended § 7-30-118 (numbered as Section 19 in the uniform act) by adding a provision that specifies that the transfer of real property will not impart notice until the date a deed or other proper instrument is recorded after July 1, 1994, whether such transfer was effective prior to July 1, 1994, and by removing the language found in subsection (b) in the uniform act. The official comment should be read with these changes in mind.

7-30-119. Saving clause.

Except to the extent set forth in section 7-30-118, this article does not affect any right accrued before July 1, 1994, or any action or proceeding then pending.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire article added, p. 1276, § 1, effective May 22.

Editor's note:

Colorado amended § 7-30-119 (numbered as Section 20 in the uniform act) by adding an exception to the savings clause to accommodate the provision added to § 7-30-118. The official comment should be read with this change in mind.